New Jersey, session 222, S1534.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. (1) The governing body of a municipality may, by resolution, establish a dredging control reserve fund.  Unexpended balances budgeted annually for dredging may be lapsed into the reserve.  Upon passage of a resolution of the governing body, funds in the reserve may be used by the municipality after current budget appropriations for any purpose related to dredging, including, but not limited to, the removal of sand, silt, mud, clay, rock, or other material from the bottom of a waterway in order to maintain or deepen navigation channels and berths, related infrastructure development of such a project, the management of the dredged material through decontamination, acceptable placement or beneficial use, and the potential funding of such projects as necessary to support New Jerseys or the municipalitys maritime, recreation, or tourism industries.  Any reimbursement of these expenditures shall be deposited back into the reserve. (2)   Unexpended balances budgeted annually for expenses relating to dredging control may be lapsed into the reserve. b.    The Local Finance Board is authorized to adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), in order to effectuate the purposes of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.